Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-25] Coordination among state and federal
agencies. The department shall initiate ongoing dialogue among relevant
state and federal agencies to identify processes and policies that ensure the
privacy of qualifying patients and the compliance of qualifying patients,
primary caregivers, and medical marijuana dispensaries with state laws and
regulations related to medical marijuana. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next